Missouri, session 2026, SB1555.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 41, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 41.1030, to read as
follows:
41.1030. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Department", the Missouri department of the
National Guard;
(2) "Living donation period", the period in which a
member who chooses to become a living organ donor completes
all phases of the living donor process deemed medically
necessary for a successful living donation including, but
not limited to, the testing, surgical, and recovery phases;
(3) "Member", a member of the Missouri National Guard;
(4) "Program", the Missouri guaranteed inclusive
voluntary exceptional service (MO GIVES) program established
in subsection 2 of this section.
2. Subject to appropriation, the department shall
establish a program for members who choose to become living
organ donors to receive living donor medical orders for
purposes of remaining on paid status during the living

SB 1555 2
donation period, to be known as the "Missouri Guaranteed
Inclusive Voluntary Exceptional Service (MO GIVES) Program".
3. Any member seeking to become a living organ donor
may apply to participate in the program. The department
shall approve a member's participation in the program if
sufficient funds are available and the member:
(1) Is in either Troop Program Unit (TPU) status or
Individual Ready Reserve (IRR) status;
(2) Is in good standing with the department;
(3) Either:
(a) Is not eligible for living donor paid leave from
the member's employer, whether due to the lack of such
employer benefit or the failure to satisfy the eligibility
requirements; or
(b) Elects not to use any such employer-based benefit
available to the member;
(4) Specifies the type of donation to be made, whether
directed to a specific individual, nondirected, or paired;
and
(5) Agrees to undergo the procurement operation at a
health care facility approved as a provider of continuing
education points for transplant certification by the
American Board for Transplant Certification.
4. Upon approval of a member's application, the
department shall issue a living donor medical order for the
member. The order shall:
(1) Guarantee paid leave for the member for the living
donation period. The period of paid leave guaranteed under
the order shall not exceed forty-five days unless an
extension of time is deemed medically necessary by the
primary surgical and medical recovery team;

SB 1555 3
(2) Exempt the member from any requirement to use
accrued annual or medical leave for the paid living donation
period guaranteed under the order; and
(3) Provide a per diem allowance and a basic allowance
for housing during the paid living donation period
guaranteed under the order based on the member's rank,
region as determined by the zip code of the member's home of
record, and dependent status.
5. Any organ donated through participation in the
program may be transported outside this state to the
ultimate recipient.
6. Benefits under the program shall be provided
through the fund established in subsection 7 of this section.
7. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury
the "MO GIVES Fund", which shall consist of moneys
appropriated to it by the general assembly and any gifts,
contributions, grants, or bequests received from federal,
private, or other sources. The state treasurer shall be
custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170
and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve disbursements.
The fund shall be a dedicated fund and, upon appropriation,
moneys in this fund shall be used solely to provide benefits
under the program established in this section.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080
to the contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at the end
of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the
fund in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any
interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.

SB 1555 4
8. The department may promulgate all necessary rules
and regulations for the administration of this section. Any
rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority
delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of
chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This
section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the
powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove
and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed
or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓